Maryland, session 2026, HB0327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–402.
(a) The Board of Community College Trustees for Baltimore County consists of
[15] 11 members appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) Of the members:
(1) [1 serves] 2 SERVE at large; and
(2) [14] 9 serve from the [7] 9 councilmanic districts in Baltimore County,
[2] 1 from each district.
(c) (1) The term of a member is 5 years and begins on July 1.
(2) A member may not serve for more than 2 consecutive terms.
(d) (1) The Governor shall appoint a chairperson from among the members of
the Board as of July 1, 1997.
(2) The chairperson appointed by the Governor shall serve until June 30,
2000.
– 1 –

Ch. 572 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) For the year beginning July 1, 2000, and each year thereafter, the
Board shall elect a chairperson from among the members of the Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The terms of the following members of the Board of Community College
Trustees for Baltimore County shall terminate on June 30, 2026:
(1) the members representing Baltimore County councilmanic districts 2,
6, and 7, as they existed before June 23, 2026, whose terms are scheduled to expire on June
30, 2026;
(2) the members representing Baltimore County councilmanic district 1, as
it existed before June, 23 2026, whose seats are vacant;
(3) the member representing Baltimore County councilmanic district 3, as
it existed before June 23, 2026, whose term expired on June 30, 2024, and whose seat is
vacant; and
(4) the member representing Baltimore County councilmanic district 4, as
it existed before June 23, 2026, whose term expired on June 30, 2025.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the following members of the Board of Community
College Trustees for Baltimore County shall represent the following Baltimore County
councilmanic districts:
(1) the member representing councilmanic district 4, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2030, shall represent councilmanic
district 2, as it exists on or after June 23, 2026;
(2) the member representing councilmanic district 3, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2029, shall represent councilmanic
district 3, as it exists on or after June 23, 2026;
(3) the member representing councilmanic district 2, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2028, shall represent councilmanic
district 4, as it exists on or after June 23, 2026;
(4) the member representing councilmanic district 6, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2027, shall represent councilmanic
district 6, as it exists on or after June 23, 2026;
(5) the member representing councilmanic district 5, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2030, shall represent councilmanic
district 7, as it exists on or after June 23, 2026;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 572
(6) the member representing councilmanic district 7, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2027, shall represent councilmanic
district 8, as it exists on or after June 23, 2026;
(7) the at–large member of the Board, whose term is set to expire June 30,
2029, shall become one of the at–large members of the Board; and
(8) the member representing councilmanic district 5, as it existed before
June 23, 2026, whose term is set to expire on June 30, 2027, shall become one of the
at–large members of the Board.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2026, the initial members representing Baltimore County
councilmanic districts 1, 5, and 9 on the Board of Community College Trustees for
Baltimore County, as the districts exist on or after June 23, 2026, shall be appointed using
the method provided under § 16–402 of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act, and shall expire as follows:
(1) the term of the member appointed to represent councilmanic district 1
shall expire June 30, 2028;
(2) the term of the member appointed to represent councilmanic district 5
shall expire June 30, 2029; and
(3) the term of the member appointed to represent councilmanic district 9
shall expire June 30, 2030.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –